Hawaii statutes.
§47-3 Purpose of issuance. Bonds
issued pursuant to this chapter shall be issued for public improvements of the
county and such other purposes as may from time to time be authorized by other
provisions of general law, including without limitation, special improvements
the cost of which is assessed or assessable in whole or in part against
properties benefitted or improved by such improvements; provided that the
issuance of those bonds for those special improvements shall be limited to
special improvements initiated by the county. The purpose or purposes of
issuance need not be stated in any bond. [L 1989, c 80, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next